Massachusetts, session 194th, H3336.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts Water
Resources Authority shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 296 of the Acts of 1993.
of 1